test/src/morphology/N-vuvdd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vuˊvdd â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     vuˊvdd+N+Sg+Nom: vuˊvdd
     vuˊvdd+N+Sg+Gen: vuuˊd
     vuˊvdd+N+Sg+Acc: vuuˊd
     vuˊvdd+N+Sg+Ill: voudda
     vuˊvdd+N+Sg+Loc: vuuˊdest
     vuˊvdd+N+Sg+Com: vuuˊdin
     vuˊvdd+N+Ess: vuˊvdden
     vuˊvdd+N+Par: vuˊvdded
     vuˊvdd+N+Sg+Abe: vuuˊdtää
     vuˊvdd+N+Pl+Nom: vuuˊd
     vuˊvdd+N+Pl+Gen: vuuˊdi
     vuˊvdd+N+Pl+Acc: vuuˊdid
     vuˊvdd+N+Pl+Ill: vuuˊdid
     vuˊvdd+N+Pl+Loc: vuuˊdin
     vuˊvdd+N+Pl+Com: vuuˊdivuiˊm
     vuˊvdd+N+Pl+Abe: vuuˊditää
